California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) In order to ensure compliance with paragraph (1) and achieve the purposes of this chapter, and except as otherwise specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 14199.109), moneys in the fund shall be used
 only to increase and enhance, and not replace or supplant, each and every preexisting state revenue source for the services and programs that receive additional financial support pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 14199.108) and Article 4 (commencing with Section 14199.109) of this chapter.

(3) Except as otherwise specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 14199.109), moneys in the fund shall not be used to supplant any preexisting state revenue source used to provide Medi-Cal services, benefits, or coverage, moneys used for the California Affordable Drug Manufacturing Act of 2020, or the health care workforce provisions set forth in this chapter.

(b) (1) The department shall annually issue a public written report providing a detailed explanation of whether or not, and how, compliance with subdivision (a) is being achieved. The report shall
 be posted on the department’s internet website.

(2) As part of its audit responsibilities under Section 14199.104, the Controller shall independently review the reports prepared by the department pursuant to paragraph (1) and publicly issue a separate written opinion regarding whether or not compliance with subdivision (a) is being achieved. Costs incurred by the Controller attributable to this requirement shall be reimbursable pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 14199.104.

(c) In any challenge alleging that the moneys in the fund, and the subfunds, accounts, and subaccounts established within the fund, are being used to supplant preexisting state revenues already used for the purposes described in this chapter, the court shall apply its independent judgment and deference shall not be accorded to the department.

(d) For purposes of this section, Sections 14199.84 and 14199.123 shall be deemed to be the same state revenue source.

(e) Additional express references in this chapter to prohibitions on supplanting funding does not imply greater nonsupplantation protection for the accounts containing those references, or lesser nonsupplantation protection for accounts lacking those references.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Deposit and Allocation of Moneys in the Fund  [14199.108. - 14199.108.5.]

14199.108.

Deposit and Allocation of Moneys

Notwithstanding any other law:

(a) (1) On and after January 1, 2025, all moneys annually derived from the tax imposed pursuant to Article 7.1 (commencing with Section 14199.80) of Chapter 7 shall be deposited into the fund.

(2) On and after January 1, 2027, all moneys annually derived from the tax imposed by Article 6 (commencing with Section 14199.123) shall be deposited into the fund.

(b) (1) Sufficient moneys shall be annually transferred by the Controller from the fund to the Health Care Oversight &
 Accountability Subfund to cover all of the following:

(A) For the 2025 and 2026 calendar years only, the amount of moneys necessary to cover the appropriations made pursuant to Section 14199.108.3.

(B) Commencing with the 2025 calendar year and each calendar year thereafter, the nonfederal share of increased capitation payments to Medi-Cal managed care plans to account for their projected tax obligation pursuant to Section 14199.84 or Article 6 (commencing with Section 14199.123), for the subject calendar year or years, as applicable.

(C) Reimbursement of the Controller for its responsibilities under this chapter.

(D) Payment of the department’s administrative costs.

(E) Repayment of any
 refunds, as applicable.

(F) Costs incurred pursuant to Section 14199.133.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys within the Health Care Oversight & Accountability Subfund are hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department to be used as set forth in this subdivision.

(3) Any unencumbered moneys remaining in the Health Care Oversight & Accountability Subfund at the end of a calendar year shall be transferred to the Improving Access to Health Care Subfund.

(c) For each applicable calendar year, after the transfers required by subdivision (b) to the Health Care Oversight & Accountability Subfund, all remaining moneys in the fund shall be transferred to the Improving Access to
 Health Care Subfund.

(d) In each calendar year, the first four billion three hundred million dollars ($4,300,000,000) transferred to the Improving Access to Health Care Subfund shall be deposited by the Controller in the following amounts in the following accounts that are hereby created within the Improving Access to Health Care Subfund:

(1) Twenty-two percent in the Primary Care Account.

(2) Twenty-two percent in the Specialty Care Account.

(3) Two and one-half of 1 percent in the Emergency Department Physicians Account.

(4) Five and three-quarters of 1 percent in the Outpatient and Clinic Access Account.

(5) Five and
 one-half of 1 percent in the Family Planning Account.

(6) One and one-quarter of 1 percent in the Reproductive Health Account.

(7) Three percent in the Emergency Medical Transportation Account.

(8) Eight and three-quarters of 1 percent in the Emergency Department and Hospital Services Account.

(9) Three and one-half of 1 percent in the Designated Public Hospital Account, subject to subdivision (g).

(10) Four and one-half of 1 percent in the Improving Mental Health Account, subject to subdivision (g).

(11) Six and one-quarter of 1 percent in the Health Care Workers Account.

(12) Three and one-half of 1 percent in the Clinic Quality Account.

(13) Three and one-half of 1 percent in the Improved Dental Services Account.

(14) Eight percent to the Medi-Cal Access and Support Account.

(e) Commencing January 1, 2027, and notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys within the accounts described in subdivision (d), and any subaccounts therein, are hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department to be used as set forth in Article 4 (commencing with Section 14199.109).

(f) (1) On and after January 1, 2030, the maximum allowable balance of unencumbered moneys in any of the accounts described in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, and (11) to (13),
 inclusive, of subdivision (d) shall be 200 percent of the average annual amount deposited therein during the immediately preceding two calendar years. This shall be known as the “maximum allowable balance.”

(2) As long as an account described in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, and (11) to (13), inclusive, of subdivision (d) is at or above its maximum allowable balance, moneys otherwise required to be deposited into that account shall instead be deposited on a pro rata basis into the other accounts described in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, and (11) to (13), inclusive, of subdivision (d) that are not at or above their maximum allowable balance.

(3) This subdivision does not apply if an account reaches its maximum allowable balance as a result of the department violating its nondiscretionary ministerial duty set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 14199.106.

(4) This subdivision does not apply if all of the accounts described in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, and (11) to (13), inclusive, of subdivision (d) are all simultaneously at or above their maximum allowable balance.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding the percentage allocation described in paragraph (9) of subdivision (d), the maximum dollar amount deposited into the Designated Public Hospital Account shall not exceed one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) per calendar year. Once the amount deposited in any calendar year into the Designated Public Hospital Account reaches one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000), any excess moneys allocated pursuant to paragraph (9) of subdivision (d) shall instead be deposited into the Emergency Department and Hospital Services Account.

(2) Notwithstanding the percentage allocation described in paragraph (10) of subdivision (d), the maximum dollar amount deposited into the Improving Mental Health Account shall not exceed two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) per calendar year. Once the amount deposited in any calendar year into the Improving Mental Health Account reaches two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000), any excess moneys allocated pursuant to paragraph (10) of subdivision (d) shall instead be deposited into the Emergency Department and Hospital Services Account.

(h) After four billion three hundred million dollars ($4,300,000,000) is first deposited pursuant to subdivision (d), in each calendar year the next four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000) transferred to the Improving Access to Health Care Subfund shall be deposited into the Medi-Cal Access and Support Account.

(i) (1) After four billion three hundred million dollars ($4,300,000,000) is first deposited pursuant to subdivision (d) and the next four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000) is deposited pursuant to subdivision (h), in each calendar year the next two hundred twenty-six million dollars ($226,000,000) transferred to the Improving Access to Health Care Subfund shall be deposited as follows:

(A) Thirty-two million dollars ($32,000,000) into the Community Health Workers Account.

(B) Sixty-four million dollars ($64,000,000) into the Health Care Workforce Loan Repayment Account.

(C) One hundred twenty million dollars ($120,000,000) into the Medi-Cal Workforce Subaccount.

(D) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) into the
 Affordable Prescription Drugs Account.

(2) Commencing January 1, 2027, and notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys within the accounts described in paragraph (1), and any subaccounts therein, are hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department to be used as set forth in Article 4 (commencing with Section 14199.109).

(j) After the deposits required by subdivisions (d), (h), and (i) are completed, all remaining moneys transferred to the Improving Access to Health Care Subfund in a calendar year shall be deposited and used as follows:

(A) Twenty-five percent to the accounts described in paragraphs (1) to (13), inclusive, of subdivision (d) on a pro rata basis according to and consistent with the relative distribution among those paragraphs.

(B) Seventy-five percent to the Medi-Cal Access and Support Account.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.108.3.

Expenditures During Calendar Years 2025 and 2026

(a) During each of calendar year 2025 and calendar year 2026 only, and notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys are hereby continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years from the Health Care Oversight & Accountability Subfund to the department in the following amounts for the following purposes:

(1) Two billion dollars ($2,000,000,000) to cover a portion of the nonfederal share of Medi-Cal managed care rates for health care services furnished to children, adults, seniors, and persons with disabilities, and persons dually eligible for the Medi-Cal and Medicare programs.

(2) Six hundred ninety-one million dollars ($691,000,000) for primary care, including obstetrics and nonspecialty mental health services.

(3) Five hundred seventy-five million dollars ($575,000,000) for specialty care.

(4) Two hundred forty-five million dollars ($245,000,000) for community and outpatient procedures.

(5) Ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) for abortion and family planning services.

(6) Fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) for services and supports for primary care.

(7) Three hundred fifty-five million dollars ($355,000,000) for emergency room facilities and physicians.

(8) One hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) for designated public hospitals.

(9) Fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) for ground emergency medical transportation.

(10) Three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) for behavioral health facility throughputs.

(11) Seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) for graduate medical education.

(12) Seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) for Medi-Cal workforce.

(b) The allocation of moneys appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121.

(c) This
 section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2027, and is hereby repealed on January 1, 2028.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.   Inoperative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.\n   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.108.5.

Treatment of Increased or Supplemental Payments

Increased or supplemental payments made pursuant to Sections 14199.108.3, 14199.109, 14199.110, 14199.110.5, 14199.112, 14199.113, 14199.114, 14199.115, 14199.116, 14199.117, 14199.119, 14199.120.5, and 14199.120.6 shall:

(a) Be in addition to existing reimbursement rates and any other payments made by a Medi-Cal managed care plan or the department and shall not supplant amounts that would otherwise be payable by a Medi-Cal managed care plan or the department to a recipient of moneys provided by Article 4 (commencing with Section 14199.109).

(b) Be considered separate and apart from any other
 reimbursement, and shall not be considered during, or factored into, any annual reconciliation.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Protecting Access to Health Care  [14199.109. - 14199.120.9.]

14199.109.

Primary Care Account

(a) Moneys in the Primary Care Account shall be used for the purpose of providing Medi-Cal patients with increased access to quality primary care services as set forth in this section.

(b) (1) The department shall, subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, increase reimbursement rates for primary care services above those in effect on January 1, 2024, and shall ensure that Medi-Cal managed care plans provide those increases in a manner consistent with the intent and purposes of this chapter.

(2) In addition to paragraph (1), in implementing this section, the
 department may, subject to federal approval and after obtaining stakeholder input pursuant to Section 14199.121, utilize different payment mechanisms, including quality incentive payments or value-based payment models, to recruit, retain, and improve primary care provider participation in Medi-Cal and improve quality.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.110.

Specialty Care Account

(a) Moneys in the Specialty Care Account shall be used for the purpose of increasing Medi-Cal patient access to specialty care services as set forth in this section.

(b) The department shall, subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, establish and implement one or more payment methodologies that meet federal requirements and that require each Medi-Cal managed care plan or its subcontracted entities to expand beneficiary access to Medi-Cal covered specialty care services. The payment methodology or methodologies developed by the department shall address the following objectives:

(1) Increase the number of Medi-Cal managed care plan-contracting specialists.

(2) Retain existing Medi-Cal managed care plan-contracting specialists within the plan’s network of contracting providers.

(3) Increase the number of Medi-Cal patients an existing Medi-Cal managed care plan-contracting specialist serves.

(4) Provide expanded specialist appointment availability for Medi-Cal patients.

(5) Support specialists in coordinating and overseeing the care of patients as part of a multidisciplinary care team.

(c) A Medi-Cal managed care plan or a subcontracted entity shall provide payments to specialists consistent with the payment methodologies developed by the department
 pursuant to this section.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.110.5.

Emergency Department Physicians Account

(a) Moneys in the Emergency Department Physicians Account shall be used for the purpose of increasing reimbursements for emergency department physicians treating Medi-Cal patients as set forth in this section.

(b) The department shall, subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, establish and implement one or more payment methodologies to increase reimbursements for emergency department physicians treating Medi-Cal patients. The payment methodology or methodologies shall be consistent with the purposes of this chapter, shall be designed to improve access and support for emergency department services, and shall not be conditioned on
 a physician’s contracted network provider status.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.111.

Community Health Workers Account

(a) The Community Health Workers Account is hereby created within the Improving Access to Health Care Subfund. Moneys in the Community Health Workers Account shall be used for the purpose of increasing access to community health workers in Medi-Cal programs as set forth in this section.

(b) The department shall, subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, establish a grant program to expand the number of locations and populations served by community health workers providing services on behalf of community-based organizations, community providers, and clinics.

(c) (1) On and after January 1, 2030, the maximum allowable balance of unencumbered moneys in this account shall be sixty-four million dollars ($64,000,000). As long as this account is at or above sixty-four million dollars ($64,000,000), moneys otherwise required to be deposited into this account shall instead be deposited on a pro rata basis into the accounts described in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, and (11) to (13), inclusive, of subdivision (d) that are not at or above their maximum allowable balance.

(2) This subdivision does not apply if this account is at or above sixty-four million dollars ($64,000,000) as a result of the department violating its nondiscretionary ministerial duty set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 14199.106, or if the accounts described in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, and (11) to (13), inclusive, of subdivision (d) are all simultaneously at or above their maximum allowable
 balance.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.112.

Outpatient and Clinic Access Account

(a) Moneys in the Outpatient and Clinic Access Account shall be used for the purpose of increasing net reimbursements for outpatient facilities, including ambulatory surgical centers and clinics, that provide eligible outpatient services and procedures to Medi-Cal patients.

(b) The department shall, subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, develop, seek federal approval for, and implement one or more payment methodologies that provide increased net reimbursement for eligible outpatient facilities, regardless of licensure type, in a manner consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

(c) Moneys in the Outpatient and Clinic Access Account shall be used only to increase net reimbursement levels for those eligible outpatient services and procedures above existing net reimbursement levels in effect for the eligible outpatient services and procedures as of January 1, 2024.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.113.

Family Planning Account

(a) Moneys in the Family Planning Account shall be used for the purpose of expanding the scope and availability of family planning services as set forth in this section.

(b) The department shall, subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, use the moneys in the account for all of the following purposes:

(1) Expanding the scope of benefits offered pursuant to the State-Only Family Planning Program and the Family PACT program.

(2) Increasing reimbursement rates for:

(A) Family planning services and family planning-related services in the Medi-Cal program.

(B) Comprehensive clinical family planning services in the Family PACT program.

(C) Family planning services in the State-Only Family Planning Program.

(3) Authorizing the department, subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, to fund practice transformation activities and to establish alternative payment methodologies, including, but not limited to, bundled payments, directed payments to both network and nonnetwork providers, capitated payments, and value-based payments for family planning, family planning-related services, and sexual and reproductive health services.

(4) Providing grant funding to qualified family planning
 providers to offset the costs of providing uncompensated outpatient services and supports.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.114.

Reproductive Health Account

(a) Moneys in the Reproductive Health Account shall be used as set forth in this section.

(b) The department shall, subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, use the moneys in the Reproductive Health Account for the purpose of protecting, preserving, and expanding access to abortion and abortion-related services, including to increase payment rates for abortion and abortion-related services.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.115.

Emergency Medical Transportation Account

(a) Moneys in the Emergency Medical Transportation Account shall be used for the purpose of increased payments to private ground emergency medical transport providers and emergency air ambulance transport providers as set forth in this section.

(b) Eighty percent of the moneys in the account shall be deposited into the Ground Emergency Medical Transportation Subaccount, which is hereby created in the Emergency Medical Transportation Account. Moneys in this subaccount shall be used for the purpose of increased payments to private ground emergency medical transport providers as follows:

(1) The
 department shall, subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, establish and implement increased net reimbursement to private ground emergency medical transport providers for ground emergency medical transports above the rates in effect as of January 1, 2024. To the extent permitted by federal law, the department shall increase net reimbursement based on the regional cost of living where the transport was rendered.

(2) The increased Medi-Cal payments described in paragraph (1) shall be applicable to fee-for-service rates to private ground emergency medical transport providers and payments from Medi-Cal managed care plans to private ground emergency medical transport providers. The department shall structure the increased Medi-Cal managed care payments pursuant to this subdivision so that private ground emergency medical transport providers that receive payments for ground emergency medical transports rendered to managed
 care patients pursuant to Section 14129.3 or any successor statute are eligible to receive payments for ground emergency medical transports rendered to Medi-Cal managed care patients pursuant to this section.

(3) Moneys in the Ground Emergency Medical Transportation Subaccount shall be used only to increase net reimbursement levels for private ground emergency medical transport providers above existing net reimbursement levels in effect for private ground emergency medical transport providers as of January 1, 2024. The director may modify or make adjustments to any methodology, fee amount, or other provision specified in Article 3.91 (commencing with Section 14129) of Chapter 7, as authorized by subdivision (b) of Section 14129.6, only to the extent necessary to meet the requirements of federal law or regulations or to obtain federal approval pursuant to Section 14129.6 after the implementation of this subdivision.

(c) Twenty percent of the moneys in the account shall be deposited into the Air Ambulance Emergency Medical Transportation Subaccount, which is hereby created in the Emergency Medical Transportation Account. Moneys in this subaccount shall be used for the purpose of increased Medi-Cal payments for emergency air ambulance transport providers as follows:

(1) The department shall, subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, establish and implement increased Medi-Cal payments for air emergency ambulance transport providers above the rates in effect as of January 1, 2024.

(2) The increased rates described in paragraph (1) shall be applicable to Medi-Cal fee-for-service payment rates to emergency air ambulance transport providers and payments from Medi-Cal managed care plans to emergency air ambulance
 transport providers.

(3) Payments made pursuant to this subdivision shall be in addition to any other Medi-Cal payments to emergency air ambulance transport providers and shall not supplant amounts that would otherwise be payable under Medi-Cal to an emergency air ambulance transport provider.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.116.

Emergency Department and Hospital Services Account

(a) Moneys in the Emergency Department and Hospital Services Account shall be used for the purpose of protecting access to, and improving the quality of, hospital care, including access to inpatient acute care and emergency departments, for Medi-Cal patients, as set forth in this section.

(b) The department shall, subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, develop, seek federal approval for, and implement one or more payment methodologies that provide increased net reimbursement to public and private hospitals for eligible hospital services. The department may adjust payments with moneys in the account.

(c) Moneys in the Emergency Department and Hospital Services Account shall be used only to increase net reimbursement levels for those eligible hospital services above existing net reimbursement levels in effect for the eligible hospital services as of January 1, 2024.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.117.

Designated Public Hospital Account

(a) Moneys in the Designated Public Hospital Account shall be used for the purpose of sustaining and promoting access to hospital and nonhospital care at designated public hospital systems.

(b) The department shall, subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, use the moneys in the account to provide increased net reimbursement or new payments for designated public hospitals and health systems, including, but not limited to, quality incentive payments under existing or successor payment mechanisms or payments in support of services provided by designated hospital systems or that enhance their capabilities, or to provide financial support
 for the nonfederal share of the Medi-Cal payments to the designated public hospital systems. The department may apply the moneys in the Designated Public Hospital Account for these purposes.

(c) Moneys in the Designated Public Hospital Account shall be used only to increase net reimbursement levels for designated public hospital systems for the eligible services above existing net reimbursement levels for the eligible services in effect as of January 1, 2024.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.118.

Affordable Prescription Drugs Account

(a) The Affordable Prescription Drugs Account is hereby created within the Improving Access to Health Care Subfund. Moneys in the Affordable Prescription Drugs Account shall be used as set forth in this section.

(b) The department shall, subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, use the moneys in the Affordable Prescription Drugs Account for the purpose of providing increased funding for the California Affordable Drug Manufacturing Act of 2020 to increase competition, lower prices, and address shortages in the market for generic prescription drugs, to reduce the cost of prescription drugs for public and private purchasers, taxpayers,
 and consumers, and to increase patient access to affordable drugs.

(c) (1) On and after January 1, 2030, the maximum allowable balance of unencumbered moneys in this account shall be twenty million dollars ($20,000,000). As long as this account is at or above twenty million dollars ($20,000,000), moneys otherwise required to be deposited in this account shall instead be deposited on a pro rata basis into the accounts described in paragraphs (1) to (8), inclusive, and (11) to (13), inclusive, of subdivision (d) that are not at or above their maximum allowable balance.

(2) This subdivision does not apply if this account is at or above twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) as a result of the department violating its nondiscretionary ministerial duty set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 14199.106, or if the accounts described in paragraphs (1) to (8),
 inclusive, and (11) to (13), inclusive, of subdivision (d) are all simultaneously at or above their maximum allowable balance.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.119.

Improving Mental Health Account

(a) (1) Moneys in the Improving Mental Health Account shall be used for the purpose of expanding access to mental health programs and services as set forth in this section.

(2) Moneys in the account shall be used to provide additional funding for inpatient psychiatric services pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) The department shall, subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, use the moneys in the account for the purpose of increasing the supply of mental health inpatient psychiatric beds by providing a supplemental payment for psychiatric inpatient days in
 licensed acute care hospitals and acute psychiatric hospitals. These payments shall:

(1) Increase the net reimbursement levels paid to these hospitals with respect to those services above the existing net reimbursement levels in effect for those services as of January 1, 2024.

(2) Not affect or supplant any other payments to these hospitals.

(3) Be made to these hospitals irrespective of contracting status with a county mental health plan or with a Medi-Cal managed care plan or other managed care entity that is financially responsible for psychiatric inpatient hospital services under contract with the department, as applicable.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.120.

Health Care Workers Account

(a) The department shall, subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, use the moneys in the Health Care Workers Account for the purpose of attracting, retaining, and expanding the pool of health care workers available to treat Medi-Cal patients as set forth in this section.

(b) Seventy-five percent of the moneys in the account shall be deposited in the Graduate Medical Education Subaccount, which is hereby created in the Health Care Workers Account. Moneys in this subaccount shall be transferred to the University of California for the administration and expenditure to other qualified entities to expand graduate medical education in order to
 achieve the goal of increasing the number of physician and surgeon residency slots and expanding the number of locations offering physician and surgeon residency programs, as compared to the number of residency slots and program locations in place on December 31, 2023. For the purposes of this section, all allopathic and osteopathic residency programs accredited by federally recognized accrediting organizations and located in California shall be eligible to apply to receive funding to support resident education in California. No later than January 1, 2027, the department may seek federal approval for the programs created or expanded pursuant to this subdivision. However, the graduate medical education programs are not contingent upon federal approval and federal financial participation.

(c) Twenty-five percent of the moneys in the account shall be deposited in the Medi-Cal Workforce Subaccount, which is hereby created in the Health Care Workers
 Account. The department may enter into an interagency agreement with another state government agency or entity to administer and implement a grant program funded by the Medi-Cal Workforce Subaccount as set forth in this subdivision.

(1) (A) No sooner than January 1, 2027, the department or its designated state government agency or entity shall issue grants pursuant to this subdivision with available moneys in the Medi-Cal Workforce Subaccount to strengthen and support the development and retention of the Medi-Cal workforce through bona fide labor-management cooperation committees.

(B) Criteria shall be established, pursuant to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, for grants to bona fide labor-management cooperation committees to support the development of high-quality workforce development programs.

(2) The criteria for grant awards may include, but is not limited to, the following:

(A) Implementing workforce training programs to promote patient safety, improve quality outcomes, and advance employee career opportunities.

(B) Developing and supporting health care workforce apprenticeship and preapprenticeship programs.

(C) Recruiting and retaining workforce.

(D) Funding for training organizations such as Taft-Hartley training funds, to support the development of the workforce.

(E) Additional investments in workforce capacity.

(3) In issuing grants pursuant to
 this subdivision, the department or its designated state government agency or entity may give preference to a bona fide labor-management cooperation committee that is organized on a multiemployer basis and involves multiple labor organizations.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.120.5.

Clinic Quality Account

(a) Moneys in the Clinic Quality Account shall be used for the purpose of providing monetary incentives for clinics that demonstrate improved quality and increased access to care for Medi-Cal patients as set forth in this section.

(b) The department shall, subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, develop and seek federal approval for a directed payment program, alternative payment methodology, or other enhanced payment methodology for clinics that meet one or more of the following objectives:

(1) Increasing appointment availability or access to health care services, including
 specialty services.

(2) Meeting improved quality measures.

(3) Improving data quality and reporting.

(4) Enhancing care coordination.

(c) Any funding methodology developed pursuant to this section shall be for enhanced payments to participating clinics on or after January 1, 2025, and moneys provided pursuant to this section shall not be used to supplant, in whole or in part, funding for any prior payment methodologies developed and submitted to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services before December 31, 2024.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.120.6.

Improved Dental Services Account

(a) Moneys in the Improved Dental Services Account shall be used for the purpose of providing enhanced access to Medi-Cal patients for specialty and restorative dental care as set forth in this section.

(b) The department shall, subject to the stakeholder input requirements of Section 14199.121, develop and seek federal approval for a payment methodology, rate augmentation, directed payment or other financial incentives to general dentists and dental specialists such as oral and maxillofacial surgeons, endodontists, periodontists, orthodontists, prosthodontists, and pediatric dentists.

(c) The